Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2220
Nursing; license; application; requirements.

An applicant for a license to practice as a registered nurse shall submit satisfactory proof that the applicant has completed four years of high school study or its equivalent as determined by the board and has completed the basic professional curriculum in and holds a diploma from an accredited program of registered nursing approved by the board. There is no minimum age requirement for licensure as a registered nurse. Graduates of foreign nursing programs shall pass a board-approved examination and, unless a graduate of a nursing program in Canada, provide a satisfactory evaluation of the education program attended by the applicant from a board-approved foreign credentials evaluation service.

Laws 1953, c. 245, § 7, p. 841;

Laws 1965, c. 414, § 2, p. 1323;

Laws 1974, LB 811, § 12;

Laws 1975, LB 422, § 8;

Laws 1980, LB 847, § 4;

Laws 1989, LB 344, § 6;

Laws 1995, LB 563, § 17;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 157;

Laws 1999, LB 594, § 37;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 23;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 44;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,132.13;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 776;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 71.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.

The Board of Nursing has power to deny a license upon proof applicant is guilty of unprofessional conduct, and upon review de novo district court may not substitute its own judgment on that issue. Scott v. State ex rel. Board of Nursing, 196 Neb. 681, 244 N.W.2d 683 (1976).